cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Kopaná > Fotbalové chrániče: Brankářské ochranné kalhoty a trenýrky; Brankářské ochranné dresy; Fotbalové chrániče hlavy a obličeje; Fotbalové chrániče kolen a loktů; Fotbalové holenní chrániče
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Futball > Futball-védőfelszerelés: Futball kapus védőalsók; Futball kapus védőfelsők; Futball fej- és arcvédők; Futball térd- és könyökvédők; Futball-lábszárvédők
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Fotbal > Echipamente de protecție pentru fotbal: Pantaloni de protecție pentru portarul de fotbal; Bluze de protecție pentru portari de fotbal; Protecții de cap și față pentru fotbal; Genunchiere și cotiere pentru fotbal; Protecții pentru tibie fotbal
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Piłka nożna > Odzież ochronna do piłki nożnej: Spodnie ochronne dla bramkarzy; Bluzy ochronne dla bramkarzy; Ochraniacze głowy i twarzy do piłki nożnej; Ochraniacze na kolana i łokcie do piłki nożnej; Piłkarskie ochraniacze goleni
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Nogomet > Zaštitna oprema za nogomet: Zaštitni donji dijelovi za nogometne vratare; Zaštitni gornji dijelovi za nogometne vratare; Štitnici za glavu i lice za nogomet; Štitnici za koljena i laktove za nogomet; Nogometni štitnici za potkoljenicu
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Jalkapallo > Jalkapallosuojukset: Jalkapallomaalivahdin suojahousut; Jalkapallomaalivahdin suojapaidat; Jalkapallon pään- ja kasvosuojat; Jalkapallon polvi- ja kyynärsuojat; Jalkapallon säärisuojat
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Fútbol > Equipamiento de protección para fútbol: Pantalones protectores para porteros de fútbol; Camisetas protectoras para porteros de fútbol; Protectores de cabeza y cara para fútbol; Rodilleras y coderas de fútbol; Espinilleras de fútbol
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 축구 > 축구 보호 장비: 축구 골키퍼 보호용 하의; 축구 골키퍼 보호용 상의; 축구 머리 및 얼굴 보호대; 축구 무릎 및 팔꿈치 보호대; 축구 정강이 보호대
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng đá > Thiết bị bảo vệ khi chơi bóng đá: Quần bảo hộ thủ môn bóng đá; Áo bảo hộ thủ môn bóng đá; Đồ bảo vệ đầu & mặt bóng đá; Đệm bảo vệ đầu gối & khuỷu tay bóng đá; Tấm bảo vệ ống chân
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Calcio > Protezioni per calcio: Pantaloni protettivi per portiere di calcio; Maglie protettive per portiere di calcio; Protezioni per testa e viso da calcio; Ginocchiere e gomitiere da calcio; Parastinchi da calcio
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 足球 > 足球護具: 足球守門員防護下著; 足球守門員防護上衣; 足球護頭與護面; 足球護膝與護肘; 足球護脛
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Fotboll > Skyddsutrustning för fotboll: Skyddsbyxor för fotbollsmålvakter; Skyddströjor för fotbollsmålvakter; Huvud- och ansiktsskydd för fotboll; Knä- och armbågsskydd för fotboll; Benskydd för fotboll
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Futbal > Futbalové ochranné pomôcky: Ochranné nohavice pre futbalových brankárov; Ochranné dresy pre futbalových brankárov; Chrániče hlavy a tváre na futbal; Chrániče kolien a lakťov na futbal; Futbalové chrániče holení
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Fußball > Fußball-Schutzkleidung: Torwart-Schutzhosen; Torwart-Schutzoberteile; Fußball-Kopf- & Gesichtsschutz; Fußball-Knie- & Ellbogenschoner; Fußballschienbeinschützer
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Futbol > Futbol Koruyucu Kıyafetleri: Kaleci koruyucu altları; Kaleci koruyucu üstleri; Futbol baş ve yüz koruyucuları; Futbol dizlikleri ve dirseklikleri; Futbol İncik Kemiği Koruyucuları
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Football > Protections de football: Bas de protection pour gardiens de but de football; Hauts de protection pour gardiens de but de football; Protections de la tête et du visage de football; Genouillères et coudières de football; Protège-tibias de football
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Fodbold > Beskyttelsesudstyr til fodbold: Beskyttelsesbukser til fodboldmålmænd; Beskyttelsestrøjer til fodboldmålmænd; Hoved- og ansigtsbeskyttere til fodbold; Knæ- og albuebeskyttere til fodbold; Fodbold – benbeskyttere
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Футбол > Защитна екипировка за футбол: Защитни панталони за футболен вратар; Защитни горнища за футболни вратари; Футболни протектори за глава и лице; Наколенници и налакътници за футбол; Протектори за пищял за футбол
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Voetbal > Beschermende uitrusting voor voetbal: Keepersprotectiebroeken voor voetbal; Keepersprotectieshirts voor voetbal; Hoofd- en gezichtsbeschermers voor voetbal; Voetbalknie- en -elleboogbeschermers; Scheenbeschermers
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 足球用品 > 足球护具: 足球守门员防护下装; 足球守门员防护上衣; 足球头部与面部护具; 足球护膝与护肘; 足球护腿板
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Futebol > Equipamento de proteção para futebol: Calças de proteção para guarda-redes de futebol; Camisolas de proteção para guarda-redes de futebol; Proteções de cabeça e rosto de futebol; Joelheiras e cotoveleiras de futebol; Caneleiras para futebol
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > サッカー > サッカー用プロテクター: サッカー用ゴールキーパープロテクトボトムス; サッカー用ゴールキーパープロテクトトップス; サッカー用ヘッド・フェイスガード; サッカー用ニー・エルボーパッド; サッカー用レガース
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Futebol > Equipamento de proteção para futebol: Calças e bermudas de proteção para goleiro de futebol; Camisas de proteção para goleiro de futebol; Protetores de cabeça e rosto de futebol; Joelheiras e cotoveleiras de futebol; Caneleiras de futebol
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Soccer > Soccer Protective Gear: Soccer Goalkeeper Protective Bottoms; Soccer Goalkeeper Protective Tops; Soccer Head & Face Guards; Soccer Knee & Elbow Pads; Soccer Shin Guards
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Fotball > Beskyttelsesutstyr for fotball: Beskyttelsesunderdeler for fotballkeepere; Beskyttelsesoverdeler for fotballkeepere; Hode- og ansiktsbeskyttere for fotball; Kne- og albuebeskyttere for fotball; Leggbeskyttere for fotball
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > ฟุตบอล > อุปกรณ์ป้องกันของฟุตบอล: กางเกงกันกระแทกผู้รักษาประตูฟุตบอล; เสื้อกันกระแทกผู้รักษาประตูฟุตบอล; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันศีรษะและใบหน้าฟุตบอล; สนับเข่าและศอกฟุตบอล; สนับแข้งฟุตบอล
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Futbolas > Futbolo apsauginės priemonės: Futbolo vartininko apsauginiai kelnaitės; Futbolo vartininkų apsauginiai marškinėliai; Futbolo galvos ir veido apsaugos; Futbolo kelių ir alkūnių apsaugos; Futbolo blauzdų apsaugos
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Nogomet > Zaščitna oprema za nogomet: Zaščitni spodnji deli za nogometne vratarje; Zaščitni zgornji deli za nogometne vratarje; Nogometni ščitniki za glavo in obraz; Ščitniki za kolena in komolce za nogomet; Nogometni ščitniki za golen
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ποδόσφαιρο > Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός ποδοσφαίρου: Προστατευτικά παντελόνια τερματοφύλακα ποδοσφαίρου; Προστατευτικά τοπ τερματοφύλακα ποδοσφαίρου; Προστατευτικά κεφαλιού και προσώπου ποδοσφαίρου; Επιγονατίδες και επιαγκωνίδες ποδοσφαίρου; Επιγονατίδες ποδοσφαίρου
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Футбол > Защитная экипировка для футбола: Защитные штаны и шорты для вратарей; Защитные свитеры и футболки для вратарей; Футбольные защитные маски и шлемы; Футбольные наколенники и налокотники; Футбольные щитки